Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3006
Practice of podiatry.

The following persons shall be deemed to be practicing podiatry: Persons who publicly profess to be podiatrists or who publicly profess to assume the duties incident to the practice of podiatry.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 72, p. 473;

C.S.1929, § 71-1001;

R.S.1943, § 71-173;

Laws 1947, c. 228, § 1, p. 723;

Laws 1961, c. 337, § 9, p. 1055;

Laws 1974, LB 778, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 25, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 541, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 25, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-173;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1028.